Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 7. Penalties and Enforcement

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

13 Am. Jur.2d Carriers §§ 21 to 35.

§ 31-18-701.
Specific crimes and penalties; enforcement.

Any person who violates any provision of this act or rule and regulation of the department, who fails to comply with any order, decision, rule or regulation of the department or who procures, aids or abets any person in the violation or noncompliance is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

The highway patrol division shall enforce the provisions of this act and all rules, regulations or orders made by virtue of this act.

The highway patrol division and such other enforcement officers as the department designates are charged with the duty of policing and enforcing the provisions of this act. The enforcement officers have authority to make arrests for violation of any of the provisions of this act. The enforcement officers may require the driver to exhibit the permit issued for the vehicle, to submit to the enforcement officer for inspection any and all bills of lading or other evidences of the character of the lading being transported in the vehicle and require the vehicle to proceed to the nearest department check station or county seat, on the route of the carrier, where the officer may inspect the contents of the vehicle for the purpose of comparing same with bills of lading or other evidences of ownership or of transportation for compensation.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

37-8-501

; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1993, ch. 68, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 31-18-101(a)(xix).

Delegation of powers constitutional. —

Laws 1935, ch. 65, § 40 (similar to this section), § 56 (§

37-8-517

, now repealed) and § 65 (since repealed, but which was similar to former § 37-8-121), could not be attacked as an unconstitutional delegation of legislative power by defendant, who was merely charged with violation of these provisions. State v. Grimshaw, 49 Wyo. 192, 53 P.2d 13,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1935).

Safety inspections. —

Subsection (c) does not authorize a highway patrol officer to order a driver to drive a truck to a department check station for a safety inspection; subsection (c) authorizes officers to order a driver to drive a truck to a check station only for inspection of the contents to determine if they match the bills of lading. V-1 Oil Co. v. Means, 94 F.3d 1420, 1996 U.S. App. LEXIS 21933 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1996).

An oil company and a driver of one of the oil company's propane trucks failed to establish that a highway patrol officer's warrantless safety inspection at a port of entry, after a valid traffic stop on a nearby road, violated the fourth amendment. V-1 Oil Co. v. Means, 94 F.3d 1420, 1996 U.S. App. LEXIS 21933 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

State v. Robbins, 2011 WY 23, 246 P.3d 864,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Feb. 10, 2011).

§ 31-18-702.
General liability.

Any person operating, driving or moving any commercial vehicle, object or contrivance over a street, highway or bridge is liable for all damages which the street, highway, bridge or appurtenances thereto or other structures in connection therewith, may sustain, as a result of any illegal or negligent operation or as a result of operating, driving or moving any commercial vehicle, object or contrivance in excess of the maximum weight or height specified and prescribed by law although authorized by a special permit issued as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 1.

§ 31-18-703.
Closing or restricting use; failure to observe signs, markers.

Any operator of a commercial vehicle who willfully fails to observe any sign, marker, warning, notice, or direction, placed or given under W.S.

24-1-108

is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof by any court of competent jurisdiction, shall be subject to a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) or to imprisonment for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days, or both.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 1.

§ 31-18-704.
Violation of speed limits; penalties. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 1; 1997, ch. 61, § 1; 1998, ch. 46, § 1; 2015 ch. 139, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2015 ch. 109, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; Laws 2016, ch. 43, § 2 and ch. 114, § 2.

§ 31-18-705.
Speed or acceleration contest or exhibition on highways.

No operator of a commercial vehicle shall engage in any motor vehicle speed or acceleration contest, or exhibition of speed or acceleration on any highway without approval of that use by the governing body in charge of the highway. No person shall aid or abet in any motor vehicle speed or acceleration contest or exhibition on any highway, without approval of that use by the governing body in charge of said highway.

No operator of a commercial vehicle shall for the purpose of facilitating or aiding or as an incident to any motor vehicle speed or acceleration contest upon a highway, in any manner obstruct or place or assist in placing any barricade or obstruction upon any highway without approval of that use by the governing body in charge of the highway.

Any person who violates this section shall upon conviction be fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than ten (10) days or both.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 1.

§ 31-18-706.
Failure to maintain liability coverage; exceptions.

The requirement to maintain liability coverage pursuant to W.S.

31-4-103

does not apply to a commercial vehicle registered or proportionally registered in this and any other jurisdiction provided the vehicle is covered by a vehicle insurance policy complying with the laws of any other jurisdiction in which it is registered.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 1.

§ 31-18-707.
Nonpayment of fees, taxes, penalties or interest.

All fees under chapter 18 of title 31, diesel fuel taxes, penalty or interest under title 39 or commercial vehicle registration fees under title 31 become delinquent if not paid as provided for by law from the date due. Delinquent diesel fuel taxes, penalties, interest or commercial vehicle registration fees are a lien on all motor vehicles owned or operated in this state by the person liable for payment of the taxes, penalties, interest or fees. If any such taxes, penalties, interest or fees remain delinquent for thirty (30) days or if any vehicle subject to the lien is about to be removed from the state, the department or its authorized enforcement agent may seize and sell the vehicle subject to all existing liens and security interests held by others, at public auction upon notice to the owner and lienholder of record as provided by Rule 4 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, and upon four (4) weeks notice of the sale in a newspaper published in the counties in which the vehicle is titled and registered. The department may bring suit in any court of competent jurisdiction to collect any delinquent fees or taxes, penalties and interest under this section.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-4-105

; Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 3; 1999, ch. 14, § 1.

§ 31-18-708.
Persons rendering emergency assistance exempt from civil liability.

Any person who provides assistance or advice without compensation other than reimbursement of out-of-pocket expenses in mitigating or attempting to mitigate the effects of an actual or threatened discharge of hazardous materials, or in preventing, cleaning up or disposing of or in attempting to prevent, clean up or dispose of any discharge of hazardous materials, is not liable for any civil damages for acts or omissions in good faith in providing the assistance or advice. This immunity does not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct. As used in this subsection:

“Discharge” includes leakage, seepage or other release;

“Hazardous materials” includes all materials and substances which are now or hereafter designated or defined as hazardous by any state or federal law or by the regulations of any state or federal government agency.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.